Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6313.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 28l. (1) In addition to other reports required by law, by not later than March 1 of each year, the unemployment insurance agency shall submit to the governor, the secretary of the senate, and the clerk of the house of representatives for referral to the chair and minority vice-chair of the appropriate committees an annual report regarding shared-work plans under sections 28b to 28m. The report shall must include all of the following: (a) The number of approved shared-work plans. , the (b) The number of participating employers. , the (c) The number of participating employees. , the (d) The amount of compensation and aid to participating employees. , and any (e) Subject to subsection (2), the unemployment insurance agency benefit error rate associated with claims paid in accordance with a shared-work plan, including, but not limited to, all of the following as determined by the unemployment insurance agency: (i) Improper payment rates. (ii) Overpayment rates. (iii) Underpayment rates. (f) Any other information that the unemployment insurance agency determines is relevant to assess the impact of shared-work plans on the unemployment compensation fund. The first report shall be submitted on or before the first day of March following the first complete calendar year during which sections 28b to 28m are in effect, and subsequent reports shall be submitted on or before the first day of March of each subsequent year. (2) The unemployment insurance agency shall report the benefit error rate under subsection (1)(e) in a manner that is consistent with federal reporting requirements. The report may include all of the following information: (a) Statewide and regional data on the benefit error rate. (b) Trends of the benefit error rate throughout time. (c) Corrective actions the unemployment insurance agency has implemented or plans to implement to correct the benefit error rate.